Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.335

Registration under or compliance with streamlined sales and use tax agreement—Prohibited requirement for businesses.

A code city may not require a business to be licensed based solely upon registration under or compliance with the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.

[ 2008 c 129 s 5.]